New York, session 2025-2026, A8428.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 11-1303 of the environmental conservation law, as 2 amended by chapter 368 of the laws of 2022, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 § 11-1303. Open seasons, size and catch limits and manner of taking fish 5 fixed by regulation. 6 Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the department 7 may, until December thirty-first, two thousand [twenty-five] twenty- 8 eight, fix by regulation open seasons, size and catch limits and manner 9 of taking of all species of fish in all waters of the state, except 10 marine fish named in subdivisions 2 and 3 of section 13-0339 of this 11 chapter and except to the extent that such open seasons, size and catch 12 limits and manner of taking are otherwise specifically provided for in 13 article 13 of this chapter. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09951-01-5